District of Columbia statutes.
34-2003.01

Cases in process.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the PSC from proceeding with respect to a formal case in process before the Commission so long as it is not inconsistent with the requirements of the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996.

History

Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-154, § 4a
as added Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-155, § 25(b), 43 DCR 4213

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1453.1.

References in Text

The federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, referred to in this section, is Pub. L. 104-104, which is codified throughout Title 47 of the United States Code.